Georgia statutes. 
(3) The lawful and reasonable exercise of the police powers of the municipal or county governing authority to the extent reasonably necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public;

(4) The enactment and enforcement of lawful and reasonable laws and rules and municipal or county ordinances and regulations concerning excavation, permitting, bonding requirements, indemnification requirements, and placement and maintenance of facilities in any public right of way that are generally applicable to all users of any public right of way, except to the extent specifically precluded by subsection (h) of Code Section 36-76-6; and

(5) The lawful and reasonable exercise of the rights established in this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-76-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 719, § 1/HB 227.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Revenue and Taxation: Amend Titles 48, 2, 28, 33, 36, 46, and 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating Respectively to Revenue and Taxation, Agriculture, the General Assembly, Insurance, Local Government, Public Utilities, and State Government," see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 217 (2011).

36-76-11. Discrimination towards potential residential subscribers prohibited.

Statute text

(a) A holder of a state franchise shall not deny access to service to any group of potential residential subscribers because of the income of the residents in the local area in which such group resides.

(b) For purposes of determining whether a cable service provider or video service provider has violated subsection (a) of this Code section, cost, density, distance, and technological or commercial limitations shall be taken into account. An alleged violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall only be considered within the description of the service area set forth in an application or amended application for a state franchise. The inability to serve an end user because a holder is prohibited from placing its own facilities in a building or property shall not be found to be a violation of subsection (a) of this Code section. Use of an alternative technology or service arrangement that provides comparable content, service, and functionality shall not be considered a violation of subsection (a) of this Code section. This Code section shall not be construed as authorizing any build-out requirements on a cable service provider or video service provider.

(c) Any potential residential subscriber or group of residential subscribers who believes it is being denied access to services in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section may file a complaint with the affected local governing authority, along with a clear statement of the facts and the information upon which it is relying to support the complaint. Upon receipt of any such complaint, the affected local governing authority shall serve a copy of the complaint and supporting materials upon the subject cable service provider or video service provider, which shall have 60 days after receipt of such information to submit a written answer and any other relevant information the provider wishes to submit to the affected local governing authority in response to the complaint. If the affected local governing authority is not satisfied with the response, the affected local governing authority shall compel the cable service provider or video service provider to participate in nonbinding mediation. If the mediation does not resolve the matter to the satisfaction of the affected local governing authority, the affected local governing authority may file a complaint with a court of competent jurisdiction. No affected local governing authority shall file an action in court without having participated in a mediation of the complaint. If such court finds that the holder of a state franchise is in material noncompliance with this Code section, the holder shall have a reasonable period of time, as specified by the court, to cure such noncompliance. The court may also award the affected local governing authority its reasonable costs and attorneys fees in seeking enforcement of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-76-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 719, § 1/HB 227.)

——————————

CHAPTER 77

THROUGH 79

Reserved

——————————

PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO COUNTIES, MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS, AND OTHER GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES

——————————

CHAPTER 80

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec.

36-80-1. Code of ethics; members of local board of education allowed to discuss policies and actions of such board outside of board meetings; exceptions.

36-80-2. Power to issue notes, certificates, and other evidence of indebtedness in anticipation of taxes.

36-80-3. Authorized investments of funds by governing bodies.

36-80-4. Delegation of governing body's investment authority to financial officer.

36-80-5. Relief from or composition of debts under federal statute prohibited.

36-80-6. State furnished services, assistance, funds, property, and other incentives for consolidated programs.

36-80-7. Execution of contracts, plans, and documents for consolidated programs.

36-80-8. Establishment of area offices for consolidated programs.

36-80-9. Promulgation of rules and regulations for consolidated programs; requirement of submission of plans and reports.

36-80-10. Election for unbonded debt - Requirement and procedure.

36-80-11. Notice of election for unbonded debt.

36-80-12. Voting in election for unbonded debt; returns and declaration of election result.

36-80-13. Authorization to incur unbonded debt following favorable vote.

36-80-14. Annual sinking fund for unbonded debt.

36-80-15. Allocation and expenditure of proceeds from timber sales from military installations and facilities.

36-80-16. Local Government Authorities Registration.

36-80-16.1. PILOT restriction; payments in lieu of taxes defined; financing capital projects.

36-80-17. Authorization to contract for utility services; conditions and limitations.

36-80-18. Environmental assessment required prior to acquiring real property for recreational area; continuing assessment.

36-80-19. General codification of ordinances and resolutions; publication and availability of code; official state repository for general codifications.

36-80-20. Decal or seal required on vehicles owned or leased by any county, municipality, regional commission, school system, commission, board, or public authority.

36-80-21. Definitions; electronic transmission of budgets.

36-80-22. Definitions; restrictions; requirements.

36-80-23. Prohibition on immigration sanctuary policies by local governmental entities; certification of compliance.

36-80-24. Limitation on elected official's or constitutional officer's use of government issued purchasing or credit cards; policy development.

36-80-25. Financing of public projects by local entities.

36-80-26. Multi-county community improvement districts for transit projects.

36-80-27. Advertisement of bid or proposal opportunities.

36-80-28. Role of consultants; disclosures; application.

Annotations

Cross references. - Powers and duties of counties, municipal corporations, and other entities, pertaining to lending of aid to construction, and operation of housing projects, § 8-3-150 et seq.

Acquisition of property by counties, municipalities, and other entities for transportation purposes generally, T. 32, C. 3.

Deferred compensation plans for county, municipal, and other employees, § 45-18-30 et seq.

Liability of officers, agents, and others of counties, municipalities, and other entities for acts performed while fighting fires or performing duties at scene of emergencies, § 51-1-30.

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

36-80-1. Code of ethics; members of local board of education allowed to discuss policies and actions of such board outside of board meetings; exceptions.

Statute text

A local board of education shall not adopt or follow any code of ethics which prevents the members of such board from discussing freely the policies and actions of such board outside of a board meeting. This Code section shall not apply to any matter or matters discussed in executive session as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 50-14-1 or which are exempt from disclosure under Code Section 50-18-72.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 200, § 1/SB 275.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-80-1, pertaining to all meetings of governing bodies to be public; private executive sessions; penalty, was repealed by Ga. L. 1988, p. 235, § 2, effective July 1, 1988. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1965, p. 118, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; and Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.

36-80-2. Power to issue notes, certificates, and other evidence of indebtedness in anticipation of taxes.

Statute text

Counties, municipalities, county boards of education, and other political subdivisions of the state which are authorized to levy taxes shall have the power and authority, within the limitations prescribed by Article IX, Section V, Paragraph V of the Constitution of Georgia, to issue notes, certificates, or other evidence of indebtedness in anticipation of the collection of taxes levied or to be levied during the calendar year.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 450, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Colonial Oil Co. v. United States Guarantee Co., 56 F. Supp. 545 (S.D. Ga. 1944); Robinson Explosives, Inc. v. Dalon Contracting Co., 132 Ga. App. 849, 209 S.E.2d 264 (1974); Dougherty County v. White, 439 U.S. 32, 99 S. Ct. 368, 58 L. Ed. 2d 269 (1978); City of Bremen v. Regions Bank, 274 Ga. 733, 559 S.E.2d 440 (2002).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Borrowing for construction projects. - When allotted funds from the State Board of Education for school construction result in construction projects of less than $200,000.00, the Georgia Education Authority (Schools) does not directly supervise construction but requires the local school system to construct the project itself and then be reimbursed by the authority. This procedure often makes it necessary for the local school system to borrow a substantial part of the construction costs for a period of nine months to a year, and such borrowing is within the legal power of local school systems. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-18.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Power of legislature to add to or make more onerous the conditions or limitations prescribed by Constitution upon incurring public debts, 106 A.L.R. 231.

36-80-3. Authorized investments of funds by governing bodies.

Statute text

(a) The governing body of a municipality, county, school district, or other local governmental unit or political subdivision, in addition to all other legal investments, may invest and reinvest money subject to its control and jurisdiction in:

(1) Obligations of the United States and of its agencies and instrumentalities;

(2) Bonds or certificates of indebtedness of this state and of its agencies and instrumentalities; and

(3) Certificates of deposit of banks which have deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; provided, however, that that portion of such certificates of deposit in excess of the amount insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be secured by direct obligations of this state or the United States which are of a par value equal to that portion of such certificates of deposit which would be uninsured.

(b) This Code section shall not impair the power of a municipality, county, school district, or other local governmental unit or political subdivision to hold funds in deposit accounts with banking institutions as otherwise authorized by law.

History

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 741, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1192, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article discussing tax-exempt financing in Georgia, see 18 Ga. St. B. J. 20 (1981).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Phrase "certificates of deposit" as used in former Code 1933, § 32-942 (see now O.C.G.A. § 20-2-411) applied to certificates of deposit issued by commercial banks and to certificates of deposit issued by federal or state chartered savings and loan associations. The investment of school funds in "certificates of deposit" issued by institutions other than those named would present a question of whether such investment would be prudent and in the exercise of sufficient care and diligence. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-306.

Investment of bond proceeds in certificates of deposit is not allowed under this section. 1974 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U74-71 (see O.C.G.A. § 36-80-3).

Responsibility of school officials. - Local school officials, in making legally authorized investments of local school funds, are not responsible if that investment results in a loss rather than a gain so long as the investment, at the time the investment was made, was reasonably prudent and cautious under the circumstances, and especially if the loss is occasioned by economic conditions over which the officials have no control. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-306.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 26B C.J.S., Depositaries, § 43 et seq. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2089 et seq.

ALR. - Extent of power of school district to provide for the comfort and convenience of teachers and pupils, 7 A.L.R. 791; 52 A.L.R. 249.

Municipal funds and credits as subject to levy under execution or garnishment on judgment against municipality, 89 A.L.R. 863.

Particular purposes within contemplation of statute authorizing issuance of bonds or use of funds by school district for specified purposes, 124 A.L.R. 883.

Requirement of prior appropriation by municipal authorities as condition of making a contract or incurring expense as applicable to local improvements, or bond issue payable only out of special funds and not constituting an obligation of the municipality, 124 A.L.R. 1467.

Rights and liabilities of municipality as to interest earned on improvement assessments or other special funds collected or held by it, 143 A.L.R. 1341.

36-80-4. Delegation of governing body's investment authority to financial officer.

Statute text

The governing body may delegate the investment authority provided by Code Section 36-80-3 to the treasurer or other financial officer charged with custody of the funds of the local government, who shall thereafter assume full responsibility for such investment transactions until the delegation of authority terminates or is revoked.

History

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 741, § 2.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Phrase "certificates of deposit" as used in former Code 1933, § 32-942 (see now O.C.G.A. § 20-2-411) applied to certificates of deposit issued by commercial banks and to certificates of deposit issued by federal or state chartered savings and loan associations. The investment of school funds in "certificates of deposit" issued by institutions other than those named would present a question of whether such investment would be prudent and in the exercise of sufficient care and diligence. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-306.

Responsibility of school officials. - Local school officials, in making legally authorized investments of local school funds, are not responsible if that investment results in a loss rather than a gain so long as the investment, at the time the investment was made, was reasonably prudent and cautious under the circumstances, and especially if the loss is occasioned by economic conditions over which the officials have no control. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-306.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 195.

ALR. - Extent of power of school district to provide for the comfort and convenience of teachers and pupils, 7 A.L.R. 791; 52 A.L.R. 249.

Municipal funds and credits as subject to levy under execution or garnishment on judgment against municipality, 89 A.L.R. 863.

Requirement of prior appropriation by municipal authorities as condition of making a contract or incurring expense as applicable to local improvements, or bond issue payable only out of special funds and not constituting an obligation of the municipality, 124 A.L.R. 1467.

Rights and liabilities of municipality as to interest earned on improvement assessments or other special funds collected or held by it, 143 A.L.R. 1341.

36-80-5. Relief from or composition of debts under federal statute prohibited.

Statute text

(a) No county, municipality, school district, authority, division, instrumentality, political subdivision, or public body corporate created under the Constitution or laws of this state shall be authorized to file a petition for relief from payment of its debts as they mature or a petition for composition of its debts under any federal statute providing for such relief or composition or otherwise to take advantage of any federal statute providing for the adjustment of debts of political subdivisions and public agencies and instrumentalities.

(b) No chief executive, mayor, board of commissioners, city council, board of trustees, or other governmental officer, governing body, or organization shall be empowered to cause or authorize the filing by or on behalf of any county, municipality, school district, authority, division, instrumentality, political subdivision, or public body corporate created under the Constitution or laws of this state of any petition for relief from payment of its debts as they mature or a petition for composition of its debts under any federal statute providing for such relief or composition or otherwise to take advantage of any federal statute providing for the adjustment of debts of political subdivisions and public agencies and instrumentalities.

History

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 1557, §§ 1, 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For comment, "Federalism, States, and the Power to Regulate Municipal Bankruptcies: Who May be a Debtor under Section 109(c)?," see 9 Bank. Dev. J. 621 (1993).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - What amounts to "indebtedness" to state within constitutional or statutory provision as to release or compromise of same, 108 A.L.R. 376.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Bankruptcy. - Debtor, a Georgia county hospital authority, was ineligible for Chapter 9 relief because the State of Georgia, pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-80-5(a), had not specifically authorized the authority to file for relief under Chapter 9. United States v. Hosp. Auth. of Charlton County (In re Hosp. Auth. of Charlton County), 56 Bankr. Ct. Dec. (LRP) 220 (Bankr. S.D. Ga. July 3, 2012).

36-80-6. State furnished services, assistance, funds, property, and other incentives for consolidated programs.

Statute text

The state and all departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other agencies thereof are authorized and empowered, within the limitations of the Constitution of Georgia, to furnish and make available services, assistance, funds, property, and other incentives to any two or more counties, municipal corporations, public corporations, and other political subdivisions of this state or any combination thereof, in connection with any program of services, benefits, administration, or other undertaking in which the state or any of its agencies participates, by furnishing supervision, services, property, administration, or funds, where such counties, municipal corporations, public corporations, or other political subdivisions are thereby able and willing to provide for the consolidation, combining, merger, or joint administration of such program or any part or function thereof by the two or more units, so as to effectuate economy or simplification in the administration or financing thereof. The incentives referred to in this Code section shall also include the assuming by the state or its agencies of a greater share or, where funds are available and such is deemed feasible, the entire cost of such participating program.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 354, § 1.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Payment for preparation of study. - State Planning and Programming Bureau (now Department of Community Affairs) can use money from Governor's emergency fund to prepare municipal planning study itself or, in the alternative, contract with a third party, such as a planning consultant, for preparation of the study by the latter. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-312.

36-80-7. Execution of contracts, plans, and documents for consolidated programs.

Statute text

The state and all of its agencies are authorized to execute such contracts, plans, or other documents as may be necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes of Code Section 36-80-6, this Code section, and Code Sections 36-80-8 and 36-80-9.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 354, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-80-8. Establishment of area offices for consolidated programs.

Statute text

The state and all of its agencies are empowered to establish and maintain area offices for such combined, consolidated, or merged undertakings.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 354, § 3.)

36-80-9. Promulgation of rules and regulations for consolidated programs; requirement of submission of plans and reports.

Statute text

The state and its agencies are authorized to prescribe such reasonable rules, regulations, and requirements and to require the submission of such plans and reports from the participating units as may be deemed necessary or desirable to the proper administration of Code Sections 36-80-6 through 36-80-8 and this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 354, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-80-10. Election for unbonded debt - Requirement and procedure.

Statute text

When any county, municipality, or political subdivision desires to incur any debt, within the purview and meaning of Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I or II of the Constitution of Georgia other than a bonded debt, the election required shall be called and held in accordance with Code Sections 36-80-11 through 36-80-14.

History

(Ga. L. 1904, p. 85, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 463; Code 1933, § 87-601; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Taxpayers may enjoin payment of illegal debt. - Taxpayers of a city have such an interest in the money raised by taxation for municipal purposes as to maintain a suit to restrain the creation or payment of illegal debts by the municipality. Renfroe v. City of Atlanta, 140 Ga. 81, 78 S.E. 449 (1913); Brumby v. Board of Lights & Waterworks, 147 Ga. 592, 95 S.E. 7 (1918).

Power under local Act to buy out competition. - Under the Act of 1906 (Ga. L. 1906, p. 846) giving the board power to erect waterworks and to make all contracts for the light and water supply, such Act did not authorize the board to pay $15,000.00 to a competing company to quit operating its electric light plant in the city, where under the contract the board obtained nothing in the way of plant, poles, etc., and such contract can be enjoined at the instance of a taxpayer. Brumby v. Board of Lights & Waterworks, 147 Ga. 592, 95 S.E. 7 (1918).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Majority of voters participating necessary. - In municipal elections to incur debt, approval of a majority of qualified voters participating in the election is required to incur debt rather than approval of a majority of all qualified voters. 1954-56 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 491.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 534, 544.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 310, 311. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2057.

ALR. - Requirement of prior appropriation by municipal authorities as condition of making a contract or incurring expense as applicable to local improvements, or bond issue payable only out of special funds and not constituting an obligation of the municipality, 124 A.L.R. 1467.

Constitutional or statutory requirement of prior approval by electors of issuance of bonds or incurring of indebtedness, by municipality, county, or state, as applicable to bonds or other instruments not creating indebtedness, 146 A.L.R. 604.

36-80-11. Notice of election for unbonded debt.

Statute text

The officers charged with levying taxes, contracting debts, and the like for the county, municipality, or political subdivision shall give notice, for a period of 30 days next preceding the day of the election, in the newspaper in which sheriff's advertisements for the county are published, notifying the qualified voters that on the day named an election will be held to determine whether the debt desired or proposed to be incurred shall be incurred by the county, municipality, or political subdivision. The notice shall specify the amount of the debt to be incurred, the purposes for which it is to be incurred, the amount of the debt to be paid annually or at shorter periods, the terms of the contract under which the debt is to be incurred, and the wording of the ballots to be used in the election for or against incurring the debt.

History

(Ga. L. 1904, p. 85, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 463; Code 1933, § 87-601.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sufficiency of compliance with requirement to specify terms of contract. - Notice specifying that the rate of interest shall be "not exceeding 6 percent per annum," is not a compliance with the provisions of this section which requires "the terms of the contract under which the debt is to be incurred" to be set forth. City of Thomasville v. Thomasville Elec. Light & Gas Co., 122 Ga. 399, 50 S.E. 169 (1905).

36-80-12. Voting in election for unbonded debt; returns and declaration of election result.

Statute text

The election shall be held at all the voting or election precincts within the limits of the county, municipality, or political subdivision. It shall be held by the same persons, in the same manner, and under the same rules and regulations as elections for officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision are held. The returns shall be made to the officers calling or ordering the election, who shall, in the presence of and together with the several managers who bring up the returns, consolidate the returns and declare the result.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 40, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 378; Ga. L. 1904, p. 85, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 464; Code 1933, § 87-602.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 29 C.J.S., Elections, § 130 et seq.

36-80-13. Authorization to incur unbonded debt following favorable vote.

Statute text

When the notice is given and the election is held in accordance with Code Section 36-80-12, if the requisite majority of the qualified voters of the county, municipality, or political subdivision voting at the election vote for incurring the debt, the authority to incur the debt in accordance with Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I or II of the Constitution of Georgia is given to the proper officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision.

History

(Ga. L. 1904, p. 85, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 465; Code 1933, § 87-604; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Counties and municipalities may incur debts, including bank loans, if approved by a majority of qualified voters, as Ga. Const. 1976, Art. IX, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Paras. I and II), amended the two-thirds vote requirement in the statute to require only a simple majority. 1977 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 77-51.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Inclusion in assessment for public improvement of amount to cover delinquencies as contrary to constitutional guaranties, 40 A.L.R. 1352; 42 A.L.R. 1185.

36-80-14. Annual sinking fund for unbonded debt.

Statute text

Any county, municipality, or political subdivision of this state which incurs an indebtedness under Code Sections 36-80-10 through 36-80-13 and this Code section shall, on or before so doing, or annually thereafter, provide, without incurring further debt thereby, an annual sum sufficient in amount to pay the principal and interest of the debt within 30 years from the date of the incurring of the indebtedness.

History

(Ga. L. 1904, p. 85, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 467; Code 1933, § 87-605; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in American Sur. Co. v. City of Thomasville, 73 F.2d 584 (5th Cir. 1934).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 5, 323, 324.

ALR. - Liability of officer for loss of sinking fund through failure of bank, 25 A.L.R. 1358.

Constitutional provisions against impairment of obligations of contract as applied to sinking funds for retirement of municipal or other public bonds, 115 A.L.R. 220.

Existing sinking fund as a factor in determining whether indebtedness or proposed indebtedness of municipality or other political subdivision exceeds constitutional or statutory limit, 125 A.L.R. 1393.

36-80-15. Allocation and expenditure of proceeds from timber sales from military installations and facilities.

Statute text

(a) The purpose of this Code section is to grant and prescribe the manner of expenditure of funds received by this state from the federal government from sales of timber from military installations and military facilities of the United States, as authorized by subsection (e) of Section 2665 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended by the Military Construction Authorization Act of 1982.

(b) The amount of such funds received by the state from sales from each military installation or facility shall be allocated to the county in which the installation or facility is located. If an installation or facility is located in more than one county, the amount allocated to each such county shall be the total amount derived from sales from that installation or facility times a fraction the numerator of which is the number of acres of the installation or facility in the county and the denominator of which is the number of acres of the installation or facility in the state.

(c) Of the amount allocated to each county, 50 percent shall be paid to the county governing authority and 50 percent shall be paid to the county board of education. If, however, there is an independent school district in any county to which funds are allocated, then 50 percent of the funds allocated to the county shall be paid to the county governing authority and the remaining 50 percent shall be proportionally divided among the county school district and each independent school district in the county according to the ratio which the average daily attendance for each system bears to the total average daily attendance for all systems in the county, except that if pupils in one district attend school in another district they shall for purposes of determining average daily attendance be considered as attending school in the district in which they reside.

(d) Funds received by a county governing authority shall be used only on the county road system. Funds received by a board of education may be used for any purpose for which the board may lawfully expend public funds.

(e) Funds received by the state as described in this Code section shall be administered by the state treasurer and distributed by the state treasurer as provided in this Code section not less often than annually.

History

(Ga. L. 1982, p. 853, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-80-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 853, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 3, 4/SB 296.)

36-80-16. Local Government Authorities Registration.

Statute text

(a) This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Authorities Registration Act."

(b) The General Assembly finds that there is a need for the state to create and maintain a record of all local government authorities. Such a record can best be maintained through annual registration of all local government authorities.

(c) The purpose of this Code section is to prescribe a registration process for all local government authorities authorized to operate in the State of Georgia by general statute, local law, or local constitutional amendment.

(d) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Debt" includes all long-term or short-term credit obligations including, but not limited to, mortgages, bonds, loans, notes, interest-bearing warrants, and advances. For the purposes of this Code section, debt shall also include lease-purchase obligations.

(2) "Local government authority" includes without limitation instrumentalities of one or more local governments created to fulfill a specialized public purpose or any other legally created organization that has authority to issue debt for a public purpose independent of a county or municipality, not to include state authorities. Local government authorities include joint authorities, regional authorities, hospital authorities, housing authorities, residential care facilities for the elderly authorities, resource recovery development authorities, solid waste management authorities, downtown development authorities, airport authorities, industrial, payroll and other development authorities, transit authorities, water and sewer authorities, parking authorities, recreation authorities, stadium and coliseum authorities, building authorities, public service authorities, or any other local government authority regardless of name. Such local government authorities may have been created by local constitutional amendment, general statute, or local law.

(e) All local government authorities authorized to operate in the State of Georgia must register annually with the Department of Community Affairs.

(f) Any local government authority which fails to register with the Department of Community Affairs shall not incur any debt or credit obligations, nor shall it be eligible for receipt of any state funds, until such time as it meets the registration requirement. Failure to register shall not have any adverse affect on any outstanding debt or credit obligation.

(g) The Department of Community Affairs shall establish registration and reporting procedures for local government authorities. Such procedures shall include, but are not limited to, information on the authority's legal name, members, function, date and means of creation, contact person, address, and telephone number.

(h) The Department of Community Affairs shall establish reasonable fees for the work related to administration and enforcement of this Code section; provided, however, no fee shall be charged or allowed for the annual registration as required in this Code section.

(i) The Department of Community Affairs shall maintain a certified list of registered local government authorities, available on request. The department shall forward annually to the judge of the probate court in any affected county the registration information for all authorities operating in that county.

(j) Local government authorities shall initially register on or before January 1, 1996, and shall register each year thereafter by the date corresponding with the due date of that authority's report as provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-81-8.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 560, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 596, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 158, § 1/HB 257.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted ", nor shall it be eligible for receipt of any state funds," in the first sentence of subsection (f); and, in subsection (j), deleted "on or before January 1 of" following "shall register" and added "by the date corresponding with the due date of that authority's report as provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-81-8".

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Local Government Efficiency Grant Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-5.

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

36-80-16.1. PILOT restriction; payments in lieu of taxes defined; financing capital projects.

Statute text

(a) This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the "PILOT Restriction Act."

(b) As used in this Code section, the term "payments in lieu of taxes" means payments made directly or indirectly:

(1) Primarily in consideration of the issuance of revenue bonds or other revenue obligations and the application by the issuer of such bonds or other obligations of the proceeds of such bonds or other obligations to finance all or a portion of the costs of acquiring, constructing, equipping, or installing a capital project; and

(2) In further consideration of the laws of the State of Georgia granting an exemption from ad valorem taxation for such capital project,

to or for the account of the issuer of revenue bonds or other revenue obligations or the public bodies whose consent would otherwise be required, in the case of the separate payments provided for under subsection (d) of this Code section. Payments in lieu of taxes shall be deemed to be payments in lieu of taxes for educational purposes in the same proportion that property taxes for educational purposes would bear to total property taxes on such capital project if the project were subject to ad valorem property taxation. The term "payments in lieu of taxes" shall not include payments made primarily in consideration for the use or occupancy of property, including but not limited to lease payments or rent paid under a lease, regardless of whether or not the lessee or tenant holds an interest that is taxable for property tax purposes.

(c) (1) No local government authority, as defined in Code Section 36-80-16, shall be authorized to issue revenue bonds or other revenue obligations to finance, in whole or in part, any capital project if the terms governing such revenue bonds or other revenue obligations provide for such capital project to be used primarily by a nongovernmental user or users that have no taxable property interest in any portion of such capital project and provide for such revenue bonds or other revenue obligations to be repaid, in whole or in part, through payments in lieu of taxes made by a nongovernmental user or users, unless:

(A) Each of the local governments that have property tax levying authority in the area in which such capital project is located consents by ordinance or resolution to the use of payments in lieu of taxes for such purposes; and

(B) In the case of payments in lieu of taxes for educational purposes, a consent is obtained that covers the use for such purposes of such payments in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section, except that the terms governing such revenue bonds or other revenue obligations may provide for one or more of the public bodies, whose consent would otherwise be required, instead to receive, in such capacity, separate payments in lieu of taxes at least equal to the property taxes that such public body or bodies would have received if the capital project were subject to ad valorem taxation or in such other amount or amounts as may be agreed to by such public body or bodies.

(2) No such revenue bonds or other revenue obligations may be so issued without compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection.
